Wisconsin, session 2025, AB127.
do enact as follows:AB127,11Section 1. 50.36 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB127,2,5250.36 (6) If the department receives a credible complaint that a pharmacy 3located in a hospital has violated its duty to dispense contraceptive drugs and 4devices under s. 450.095 (2), the department shall refer the complaint to the 5department of safety and professional services.AB127,26Section 2. 450.095 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB127,2,77450.095 (title) Duty to dispense contraceptives.AB127,38Section 3. 450.095 (1) (a) of the statutes is repealed.AB127,49Section 4. 450.095 (1) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB127,2,1310450.095 (1) (am) “Absolute contraindication” means any condition present in 11a patient that renders a particular drug or device not safe to be used as prescribed 12under any circumstance because of the severe or potentially life-threatening risks 13involved.AB127,514Section 5. 450.095 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB127,3,415450.095 (2) (intro.) Unless one or more any of the following applies, except as 1provided in sub. (2m), a pharmacy shall dispense any lawfully prescribed 2contraceptive drugs and devices drug or device and shall deliver contraceptive 3drugs and devices restricted to distribution by a pharmacy the drug or device to a 4the patient without delay:AB127,65Section 6. 450.095 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB127,3,76450.095 (2) (a) The prescription or prescription order contains an obvious or 7known error or contains inadequate instructions.AB127,78Section 7. 450.095 (2) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB127,3,119450.095 (2) (am) A pharmacist determines after reviewing the prescription 10order and the patient’s medical records that there is an absolute contraindication 11for the prescribed drug or device.AB127,812Section 8. 450.095 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB127,3,1513450.095 (2) (b) The prescription is contraindicated for the patient, prescribed 14drug or device is incompatible with another drug or device prescribed for the 15patient, or is prohibited by state or federal law.AB127,916Section 9. 450.095 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB127,3,1817450.095 (2) (c) The prescription or prescription order is potentially 18fraudulent.AB127,1019Section 10. 450.095 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB127,4,220450.095 (2m) If any pharmacist at a pharmacy refuses to dispense a lawfully 21prescribed drug or device for reasons of conscience such that the pharmacy cannot 22fulfill a prescription or prescription order without delay, then the pharmacy shall 23transfer the prescription or prescription order to a different pharmacy, at the 1direction of the patient, that will dispense the prescribed drug or device without 2delay.AB127,113Section 11. 632.865 (6m) of the statutes is created to read:AB127,4,84632.865 (6m) Off-label therapies. No pharmacy benefit manager may in 5any way penalize a pharmacy or pharmacist for dispensing a prescribed drug or 6device that is prescribed for a use other than a use approved by the federal food and 7drug administration if the prescribed drug or device is dispensed pursuant to a 8valid prescription order, as defined in s. 450.01 (21).AB127,4,99